zh-CN: 举重联合会认证: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; 其他
sl-SI: Certifikat zveze za dvigovanje uteži: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Drugo
el: Πιστοποίηση της Ομοσπονδίας Άρσης Βαρών: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Άλλο
nb: Sertifisering av vektløfterforbundet: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Annet
th: ใบรับรองจากสหพันธ์ยกน้ำหนัก: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; อื่นๆ
ru: Сертификация федерации тяжелой атлетики: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Другое
tr: Halter federasyonu sertifikası: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Diğer
ja: ウェイトリフティング連盟認証: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; その他
fr: Certification par une fédération de sports de force: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Autre
ko: 역도 연맹 인증: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; 기타
vi: Chứng chỉ của liên đoàn cử tạ: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Khác
bg-BG: Сертификация от федерация по вдигане на тежести: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Друго
es: Certificación de la federación de levantamiento de pesas: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Otro
da: Certificering fra vægtløftningsforbund: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Andet
lt-LT: Sunkiosios atletikos federacijos sertifikavimas: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Kita
it: Certificazione della federazione di sollevamento pesi: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Altro
hr-HR: Certifikacija federacije za dizanje utega: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Ostalo
pl: Certyfikacja federacji podnoszenia ciężarów: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Inne
sk-SK: Certifikácia federácie vzpierania: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Iné
de: Zertifizierung durch Gewichtheberverbände: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Andere
pt-PT: Certificação por federação de levantamento de peso: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Outro
pt-BR: Levantamento de peso certificação de federação: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Outra
ro-RO: Certificarea federației de haltere: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Altele
sv: Certifiering för tyngdlyftningsförbundet: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Övrigt
zh-TW: 舉重協會認證: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; 其他
hu: Súlyemelő szövetségi tanúsítvány: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Egyéb
nl: Gewichthef federatie certificering: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Overig
cs: Certifikace vzpěračské federace: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Jiná
fi: Painonnostoliiton sertifiointi: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Muu
en: Weightlifting federation certification: EPF; IPF; IPL; IWF; USAPL; USPA; WPC; Other